Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.040

Procedure to purchase—Requisitions—Price at which sold—Disposition of proceeds—Duties of governor.

In purchasing federal surplus property on requisition for any eligible donee the director may advance the purchase price thereof from the enterprise services account, and he or she shall then in due course bill the proper eligible donee for the amount paid by him or her for the property plus a reasonable amount to cover the expense incurred by him or her in connection with the transaction. In purchasing surplus property without requisition, the director shall be deemed to take title outright and he or she shall then be authorized to resell from time to time any or all of such property to such eligible donees as desire to avail themselves of the privilege of purchasing. All moneys received in payment for surplus property from eligible donees shall be deposited by the director in the enterprise services account. The director shall sell federal surplus property to eligible donees at a price sufficient only to reimburse the enterprise services account for the cost of the property to the account, plus a reasonable amount to cover expenses incurred in connection with the transaction. Where surplus property is transferred to an eligible donee without cost to the transferee, the director may impose a reasonable charge to cover expenses incurred in connection with the transaction. The governor, through the director of enterprise services, shall administer the surplus property program in the state and shall perform or supervise all those functions with respect to the program, its agencies and instrumentalities.

[ 2015 c 225 s 43; 1998 c 105 s 4; 1995 c 137 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 135 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 70 s 5; 1945 c 205 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-64.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.